North Dakota, session 69, SB2096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - REGIONAL ACUTE PSYCHIATRIC TREATMENT AND
RESIDENTIAL SUPPORTIVE HOUSING SERVICES. There is appropriated out of any moneys
in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $16,000,000, or
so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of health and human services for
the purpose of providing facility and operations grants to improve regional acute psychiatric
treatment services and residential supportive housing, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,
and ending June 30, 2027. The department may use the funds provided in this section for the
purpose of providing behavioral health grants to improve facilities and operations. To be eligible
to receive a grant under this section, a recipient shall increase the number of inpatient
behavioral health beds as determined by the department. The beds must be for the purpose of
providing acute psychiatric treatment or residential supportive housing. The department shall
require an entity receiving a grant to operate the behavioral health facility for at least ten years
and enter into a contract accordingly. Facility locations must be based on options to eliminate or
reduce the number of referrals to the state hospital. The department shall distribute grants to
ensure equal acute psychiatric treatment and residential supportive housing services in each
quadrant of the state.
Page No. 1 25.0114.06000